Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.027

One-number locator services—Single statewide toll-free telephone number.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5627-S.SL) ***

(1) The commission must establish a single statewide toll-free telephone number to be used for referring excavators to the appropriate one-number locator service.

(2) The commission, in consultation with the Washington utilities coordinating council, must establish minimum standards and best management practices for one-number locator services.

(3) One-number locator services must be operated by nongovernmental agencies.

(4) All facility operators within a one-number locator service area must subscribe to the service.

(5) Failure to subscribe to a one-number locator service constitutes willful intent to avoid compliance with this chapter.

[ 2011 c 263 s 3; 2005 c 448 s 2; 2000 c 191 s 16.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.

Intent—Findings—Conflict with federal requirements—Short title—Effective date—2000 c 191: See RCW 81.88.005 and 81.88.900 through 81.88.902.